Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.08.090

Conduct of elections.

The election upon the question of becoming a charter code city and framing a charter and the election of the charter commission, and the election upon the adoption or rejection of the proposed charter and the officers to be elected thereunder, the returns of both elections, the canvassing thereof, and the declaration of the result shall be governed by the laws regulating and controlling elections in the city.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.090.]